Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1675.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1364.1(b) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 1364.1. Special plates for current members of the armed forces of the United States.* * *(b) Eligibility.--A plate issued under subsection (a) shall be for members of the Pennsylvania National Guard and the following branches of the armed forces of the United States:(1) Army.(2) Navy.(3) Air Force.(4) Marine Corps.(5) Coast Guard.12345678910111213141516171819 (6) Space Force.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1675PN2048 - 2 - 123